Utah statutes.
78A-10-204.   Vacancies.

(1)  The governor shall fill any vacancy in the office of Appellate Court Nominating Commission.

(2)  If an appellate court nominating commissioner is disqualified or is otherwise unable to serve, the governor shall appoint a new commissioner of the same political party as the unavailable commissioner.

(3)  If a vacancy occurs among commission members who are also members of the Utah State Bar, the governor shall replace that commissioner with a person from a list of nominees submitted by the Utah State Bar as provided in Section 78A-10-202.

(4)  The governor shall ensure that each person who is appointed to fill any vacancy on the Appellate Court Nominating Commission, other than a vacancy caused by expiration of term, is a member of the same political party as the commissioner whom the person replaced.

(5)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term and may not be reappointed.

